Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB800.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 521(a) and 531(a) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 521. Establishment and use of Fish Fund.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title, all fees, royalties, fines, penalties and other moneys paid, received, recovered and collected under the provisions of this title shall be placed in a separate fund by the State Treasurer to be known as the "Fish Fund" and shall be used solely for the following purposes:* * *(17) Any expenses required for the business of the 123456789101112131415161718 commission related to boats and boating which benefits fish and fishing. The commission shall create and maintain a record of all funds expended under this paragraph and the purpose for which the funds are utilized. The commission shall provide annual reports of all funds expended under this paragraph and the purpose for which the funds are utilized to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Game and Fisheries Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Game and Fisheries Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives. The reports under this paragraph shall be submitted no later than January 31 of each year for funds expended under this paragraph from the preceding fiscal year. The information under this paragraph may be included as part of the report required under section 503(b).* * *§ 531. Establishment and use of Boat Fund.(a) General rule.--All fees, royalties, fines, penalties and other moneys paid, received, recovered and collected under the provisions of section 747 (relating to proceeds from sales and grants) and Part III (relating to boats and boating), as well as all funds received pursuant to section 17 of the act of May 21, 1931 (P.L.149, No.105), known as "The Liquid Fuels Tax Act," shall be placed in a separate fund by the State Treasurer to be known as the "Boat Fund." The use of the Boat Fund shall generally be limited to carrying out the functions of the commission that relate to boats and boating and, subject to this 20250SB0800PN0861 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 general limitation, the fund may be used solely for the following purposes:* * *(14) Any expenses required for the business of the commission related to fish and fishing which benefits boats and boating. The commission shall create and maintain a record of all funds expended under this paragraph and the purpose for which the funds are utilized. The commission shall provide annual reports of all funds expended under this paragraph and the purpose for which the funds are utilized to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Game and Fisheries Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Game and Fisheries Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives. The reports under this paragraph shall be submitted no later than January 31 of each year for funds expended under this paragraph from the preceding fiscal year. The information under this paragraph may be included as part of the report required under section 503(b).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0800PN0861 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324